District of Columbia statutes.
20-531

Appointment; qualifications.

(a)

Appointment. —

Upon the filing of a petition by an interested party, a creditor, or the Register, or upon the motion of the Court, the Court may appoint a special administrator: (1) when the appointment is necessary to protect property prior to the appointment and qualification of a personal representative; or (2) upon the termination of appointment of a personal representative and prior to the appointment of a successor personal representative.

(b)

Qualifications. —

The Court may appoint any suitable person as a special administrator. In making such appointment, the Court shall give special consideration to any person who is likely to be appointed as the personal representative in accordance with section 20-303 and who is immediately available for appointment.

June 24, 1980, D.C. Law 3-72, § 101, 27 DCR 2155
1981 Ed., § 20-531.
This section is referenced in § 20-101.